Nebraska, session 109, LB1186.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1186 LB1186
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 7 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Affordable American Energy and Jobs Act.
Sec. 2. The Legislature finds and declares the following:
(1) Electric rates are rising rapidly across the United States due
to unprecedented demand for electricity;
(2) There is a need for energy generation resources which can be
quickly developed and can create jobs and economic benefits in local
communities;
(3) Affordable American energy can be quickly developed and can
provide jobs, tax revenues, and economic benefits across the state;
(4) Affordable American energy can provide the lowest cost energy
generation resources to the people of the state;
(5) Affordable American energy enhances our national security by
reducing reliance on foreign fossil fuels;
(6) Affordable American energy does not emit carbon dioxide or other
harmful substances that can contaminate our lifegiving and sustaining
natural resources; and
(7) Use of best practices which provide guidance to local governing
bodies on issues related to protecting wildlife habitat, bird migration
corridors, native prairies, cultural heritage sites, and prime
agricultural areas as well as dealing with economic and social impacts
can address challenges related to the development of affordable American
energy.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Affordable American Energy and Jobs
Act:
(1) Affordable American energy means electric energy generated using
wind, solar, biomass, geothermal, hydropower, or battery energy storage
systems or other storage devices for later transmission, distribution, or
use;
(2) Battery energy storage system means a resource capable of
receiving electric energy from the electrical grid or from a generation
-2-

LB1186 LB1186
2026 2026
resource with which the system is associated and storing such electric
energy for injection into the electrical grid;
(3) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment; and
(4) Private electric supplier has the same meaning as in section
70-1001.01.
Sec. 4. Before any affordable American energy project and facility
is constructed by any private electric supplier, such supplier shall
enter into a power purchase agreement or similar contractual agreement
with a Nebraska public power district, public power and irrigation
district, municipality, registered group of municipalities, electric
cooperative, electric membership association, any other governmental
entity, or any combination thereof, for purchase of all electric energy
and electric capacity of such project or facility and shall maintain a
contractual relationship for purchase of such energy and capacity
throughout the operational life of the project or facility. Privately
developed affordable American energy projects or facilities shall not be
subject to eminent domain by any Nebraska public power district or
similar entity that supplies electricity to the public in the state of
Nebraska.
Sec. 5. (1) The department shall develop a list of affordable
American energy best practices based on factual information and data for
siting affordable American energy projects, including, but not limited
to, standards or matrices that can be used by county boards and planning
and zoning officials.
(2) In developing the affordable American energy best practices, the
department shall seek assistance from the Game and Parks Commission, the
Department of Economic Development, representatives of Nebraska public
power districts, counties, health departments, energy developers,
agricultural producers, representatives of conservation organizations,
and others who have expertise in this area.
-3-

LB1186 LB1186
2026 2026
(3) The department shall also consider siting criteria developed in
other states to the extent such criteria provide examples of best
practices.
(4) Affordable American energy best practices shall include, but not
be limited to, the following:
(a) Appropriate setbacks for different types of affordable American
energy facilities which support the development of such facilities;
(b) Appropriate notices to neighboring residents and property
owners;
(c) Criteria for protecting wildlife habitat areas, bird migration
corridors, native prairies, or other environmentally sensitive areas;
(d) Criteria for protecting culturally sensitive areas;
(e) Criteria for protecting prime agricultural lands;
(f) Guidelines for community benefit agreements or other guidelines
which maximize job creation, with an emphasis on job creation for
Nebraska residents and union members, and economic benefit to local
communities and the state;
(g) Consideration of benefits to public power districts and their
customers;
(h) Other criteria which enable local officials to respond to valid
issues and concerns; and
(i) Expedited review processes for facilities which fail to meet
affordable American energy best practices.
(5) On or before October 15, 2026, the department shall publish a
preliminary list of affordable American energy best practices on the
department's website which shall be open to public comment for thirty
days. The department may hold one or more public hearings on such
preliminary list.
(6) On or before December 15, 2026, the department shall publish a
final list of affordable American energy best practices on the
department's website.
-4-

LB1186 LB1186
2026 2026
(7) The list of affordable American energy best practices shall not
be binding on any county board or local zoning authority.
(8) Any county which adopts the list of affordable American energy
best practices in its planning and zoning process shall be eligible to
receive additional revenue under the nameplate capacity tax.
(9) The department shall use existing staff and other resources of
the department to develop the list of affordable American energy best
practices.
Sec. 6. There is hereby created the Affordable American Energy Best
Practices Cash Fund. The fund shall be administered by the department.
The fund may receive gifts, bequests, grants, or other contributions or
donations from public or private entities. No General Funds shall be
transferred to the Affordable American Energy Best Practices Cash Fund.
The fund shall be used for educational purposes related to the Affordable
American Energy and Jobs Act and not as incentive payments related to any
application or project. Any money in the fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.
Sec. 7. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out the Affordable American Energy and Jobs Act.
Sec. 8. Section 77-6202, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-6202 For purposes of sections 77-6201 to 77-6204:
(1) Commissioned means the renewable energy generation facility has
been in commercial operation for at least twenty-four hours. A renewable
energy generation facility is not in commercial operation unless the
renewable energy generation facility is connected to the electrical grid
or to the end user if the renewable energy generation facility is a
customer-generator as defined in section 70-2002;
(2) Nameplate capacity means the capacity of a renewable energy
-5-

LB1186 LB1186
2026 2026
generation facility to generate electricity as measured in megawatts,
including fractions of a megawatt. Nameplate capacity shall be determined
based on the facility's alternating current capacity; and
(3) Renewable energy generation facility means (a) a facility that
generates electricity using wind as the fuel source, or (b) a facility
that generates electricity using solar, biomass, or landfill gas as the
fuel source if such facility was installed on or after January 1, 2016,
and has a nameplate capacity of one hundred kilowatts or more, or (c) a
battery energy storage system as defined in section 3 of this act.
Sec. 9. Section 77-6204, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-6204 (1) The county treasurer shall distribute all revenue
received from the Department of Revenue pursuant to section 77-6203 as
follows:
(a) Five percent of such revenue shall be distributed to the
community college area in which the renewable energy generation facility
is located; and
(b) The remainder of such revenue shall be distributed to local
taxing entities which, but for such personal property tax exemption,
would have received distribution of personal property tax revenue from
depreciable personal property used directly in the generation of
electricity using wind, solar, biomass, or landfill gas as the fuel
source.
(2) A local taxing entity's status as eligible for distribution
under subdivision (1)(b) of this section shall not be affected when and
if the net book value of personal property used directly in the
generation of electricity using wind, solar, biomass, or landfill gas as
the fuel source becomes zero. A local taxing entity's status as eligible
for distribution under such subdivision shall be affected by the disposal
of all of the exempt depreciable personal property used directly in the
generation of electricity using wind, solar, biomass, or landfill gas as
-6-

LB1186 LB1186
2026 2026
the fuel source.
(3)(a) (3) The distribution to each eligible local taxing entity
under subdivision (1)(b) of this section shall be calculated by
determining the amount of taxes that the eligible local taxing entity
levied during the taxable year and dividing this amount by the total tax
levied by all of the eligible local taxing entities during the year.
(b)(i) After the resulting fraction has been determined for each
eligible local taxing entity, the revenue shall first be distributed to
all counties that are eligible local taxing entities and that have
adopted the list of affordable American energy best practices published
pursuant to subsection (6) of section 5 of this act by multiplying the
resulting fraction of each such county by one hundred fifty percent and
then multiplying the resulting amount by the amount of revenue available
for distribution pursuant to subdivision (1)(b) of this section to
determine the portion of such revenue due each such county.
(ii) The revenue distributed to a county under subdivision (3)(b)(i)
of this section may be used as follows:
(A) Fifty percent of the revenue shall be retained by the county and
used for property tax relief for taxpayers of the county; and
(B) Fifty percent of the revenue shall be distributed by the county
to all electric utilities that provide electric service in the county to
be used to reduce the electric bills of the customers of such utilities
through energy efficiency, demand side programs or projects, or other
similar programs as determined by each utility. The distribution under
this subdivision shall be allocated among the utilities on a pro rata
basis based on the number of residential customers served in the county
by each utility.
(c) After such distribution, the resulting fraction of each eligible
local taxing entity that is not a county that has adopted the list of
affordable American energy best practices Each eligible entity's
resulting fraction shall then be multiplied by the remaining amount of
-7-

LB1186 LB1186
2026 2026
revenue available for distribution pursuant to subdivision (1)(b) of this
section to determine the portion of such revenue due each such local
taxing entity.
(4) The Department of Revenue shall not retain any revenue collected
pursuant to sections 77-6201 to 77-6204 for distribution, use, transfer,
pledge, or allocation to or from the General Fund.
Sec. 10. Original section 77-6202, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, and section 77-6204, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
are repealed.
-8-